Utah statutes.
78B-6-903.   Necessary parties -- Unrecorded rights barred.

A person holding a conveyance from or under the mortgagor or having a lien on the property, neither of which is properly documented or recorded in the proper office at the time of the commencement of the action, is not required to be made a party to the action.  The proceedings and any judgment rendered are conclusive against the party holding the unrecorded conveyance or lien as if the person had been made a party to the action.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

